California statutes. Education Code
Any leave of absence granted under this article shall not be deemed a break in service for any purpose, except that such leave shall not be included as service in computing service for the granting of any subsequent leave under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88223.

Every employee granted a leave of absence pursuant to this article may be required to perform such services during the leave as the governing board of the district and the employee may agree upon in writing. The employee shall receive such compensation during the period of the leave as the governing board and the employee may agree upon in writing, which compensation shall be not less than the difference between the salary of the employee on leave and the salary of a substitute employee in the position which the employee held prior to the granting of the leave. However, in lieu of such difference, the board may pay one-half of the salary of the employee on leave or any additional amount up to and including the full salary of the employee on leave.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88224.

Compensation granted by the governing board to the employee on leave may be paid in two equal annual installments during the first two years of service rendered in the employ of the governing board following the return of the employee from the leave of absence. The compensation shall be paid the employee while on the leave of absence in the same manner as if the employee were working for the district, upon the furnishing by the employee of a suitable bond indemnifying the governing board of the district against loss in the event that the employee fails to render at least two years’ service in the employ of the governing board following the return of the employee from the leave of absence. The bond shall be exonerated in the event the failure of the employee to return and render two years’ service is caused by the death or physicial or mental disability of the employee. If the governing board finds, and by resolution declares, that the interests of the district will be protected by the written agreement of the employee to return to the service of the district and render at least two years’ service therein following his return from the leave, the governing board in its discretion may waive the furnishing of the bond and pay the employee on leave in the same manner as though a bond is furnished.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88225.

Where one governing board serves as the governing board of two or more separate districts, an employee may fulfill the service requirements provided in Sections 88222 or 88224, or both, by service in any one or more of the districts under the jurisdiction of such governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88226.

This article shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter or other applicable provisions of this code that may hereafter be enacted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88227.

The governing board of any community college district may grant reimbursement of the costs, including tuition fees, to any permanent classified employee who satisfactorily completes approved training to improve his or her job knowledge, ability, or skill. Programs eligible for reimbursement shall include, but not be limited to, courses of study at approved academic institutions, seminars and training institutes conducted by recognized professional associations, and conferences, meetings, and other training programs that are designed to upgrade the classified service and to encourage retraining of employees who may otherwise be subject to layoff as the result of technological changes. Eligibility for reimbursement shall be in accordance with rules established by the personnel commission in those districts that have adopted a merit system. This section shall not apply to any employee who is receiving training and is eligible for reimbursement by any other governmental agency, organization, or association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 242.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Instructional Aides [88240. - 88249.]

88240.

This article may be cited as the Instructional Aide Act of 1968. The provisions of this article shall apply to personnel referred to in Section 72401 or any other section enacted before or after November 13, 1968, who perform the duties of instructional aides.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 406.)
-------------------------------------------

88241.

The Legislature recognizes the need to provide classroom instructors and other faculty with more time to instruct and to provide the means for them to utilize their professional knowledge and skills more effectively in the educational programs of the public schools. It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize the employment of instructional aides in order that classroom instructors and other faculty may draw upon the services of instructional aides to assist them in ways determined to be useful in improving the quality of educational opportunities for students.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 201.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88242.

Instructional aides shall not be utilized to increase the number of students in relation to the number of classroom instructors in any community college district.

All instructional aide positions in a community college district shall be assigned the basic title of “instructional aide” or other appropriate title designated by the governing board. To provide for differences in responsibilities and duties, additions to the basic title may be assigned such as “instructional aide I or II” or “instructional aide—volunteer,” or other appropriate title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 407.)
-------------------------------------------

88243.

As used in this article, “instructional aide” means a person employed to assist classroom instructors and other faculty in the performance of their duties and in the supervision of students and in instructional tasks which, in the judgment of the faculty to whom the instructional aide is assigned, may be performed by a person not qualified as a classroom instructor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 202.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88244.

(a) Subject to the provisions of this article, any community college district may employ instructional aides to assist classroom instructors and other faculty in the performance of duties as defined in Section 88243. An instructional aide shall perform only such duties as, in the judgment of the faculty to whom the instructional aide is assigned, may be performed by a person not qualified as a classroom instructor. These duties shall not include assignment of grades to students. An instructional aide need not perform such duties in the physical presence of the instructor but the faculty member shall retain responsibility for the instruction and supervision of the students in his or her charge.

(b) Educational qualifications for instructional aides shall be prescribed by the community college district employer and shall be appropriate to the responsibilities to be assigned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 203.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88245.

No instructional aide shall give out any personal information concerning any student who is not his or her own child or ward, except under judicial process, to any person other than a faculty member or administrator in the college which the student attends. A violation of this section may be a cause for disciplinary action, including dismissal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 243.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88247.

(a) An instructional aide shall not be deemed an academic employee for the purposes of apportioning state aid and no regrouping of students with instructional aides shall be construed as a class for apportionment purposes.

(b) Instructional aides shall be classified employees of the district, and shall be subject to all of the rights, benefits, and burdens of the classified service, except as specified in Section 88005 for “restricted” positions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 206.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88248.

The community college district shall pay to each person employed as an instructional aide compensation at a rate not less than the minimum hourly rate prescribed by federal law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88249.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this article, or any other provisions of law, a community college district may utilize volunteers in the supervision and instruction of students, but any such volunteer shall be subject to the provisions of Section 72401 and this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Assumption by County Superintendent of Schools of the Operation of a Community College District’s Data Processing Center [88260. - 88263.]

88260.

The provisions of this article shall become applicable upon the execution of an agreement between a county superintendent of schools and a community college district governing board providing for the assumption by the county superintendent of schools of a data processing center operated by the community college district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

88261.

A community college district classified employee assigned to a data processing center which is transferred to a county superintendent of schools shall, upon the election of the employee to do so, cease to be an employee of the community college district upon the effective date of the agreement transferring the data processing center to the county superintendent of schools and shall thereafter be an employee of the county superintendent of schools and be paid from the county school service fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 207.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88262.

District employees whose status is changed pursuant to this article shall retain all accumulated and unused sick leave, vacation, seniority rights and other rights and benefits which can reasonably be construed to have been an earned right at the time of transfer to the county school service fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

88263.

No employee transferred from community college district service pursuant to this article to a position, the salary of which is paid from the county school service fund, shall suffer any loss of salary at the time of transfer, or as to the future as it relates to his or her status on the salary scale of the county superintendent of schools in effect at that time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 244.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Classified School Employee Week [88270. - 88270.]

88270.

The third full week in May is designated as Classified School Employee Week.

All community colleges shall annually observe that week in recognition of classified school employees and the contributions they make to the educational community. The observances required by this section shall be integrated into the regular community college program.

This section shall apply to all colleges under the jurisdiction of any community college district that has adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060), as well as to colleges under the jurisdiction of any district that has not adopted the merit system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 45, Sec. 2.   Effective April 2, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. The Classified Community College Employee Summer Assistance Program [88280. - 88280.]

88280.

(a) The Classified Community College Employee Summer Assistance Program is hereby established for participating classified employees of participating community college districts under this section.

(b) The program shall provide a participating classified employee up to one dollar ($1) for each one dollar ($1) that the classified employee has elected to have withheld from the classified employee’s monthly paychecks pursuant to this section.

(c) A community college district may elect to participate in the program. A participating community college district shall notify classified employees, by January 1 during a fiscal year in which moneys are appropriated for purposes of this section, that the
 community college district has elected to participate in the program for the next academic year. Once a community college district elects to participate in the program and notifies classified employees pursuant to this subdivision, the community college district is prohibited from reversing its decision to participate in the program for the next academic year beginning after the end of a fiscal year in which moneys are appropriated for purposes of this section.

(d) (1) A classified employee who elects to participate in the program shall notify the community college district, in writing, by March 1 during a fiscal year in which moneys are appropriated for purposes of this section, on a form developed by the chancellor’s office that the classified employee wishes to participate in the program for the applicable academic year. The classified employee shall specify the amount to be withheld from their monthly paychecks during
 the applicable academic year and whether they choose to have the amounts withheld paid out during the summer recess period in either one or two payments. A participating classified employee may elect to have up to 10 percent of the classified employee’s monthly pay withheld during the applicable academic year.

(2) A classified employee is eligible to participate in the program if the classified employee has been employed with the community college district for at least one year at the time the classified employee elects to participate in the program.

(3) (A) A classified employee is eligible to participate in the program if the classified employee is employed by the community college district in the employee’s regular assignment for 11 months or fewer out of a 12-month period. For purposes of determining a classified employee’s total months employed by the
 community college district, the employing community college district shall exclude any hours worked by the classified employee outside of their regular assignment.

(B) For the 2023–24 and 2024–25 academic years, for purposes of determining a classified employee’s total months employed by the community college district, the employing community college district shall exclude any hours worked by the classified employee as a result of an extension of the academic year directly related to the COVID-19 pandemic, if the hours are in addition to the employee’s regular assignment and would prevent the employee from being eligible to participate in the program.

(4) (A) A classified employee is not eligible to participate in the program if the classified employee’s regular annual pay received directly from the community college district is more than sixty-two thousand
 four hundred dollars ($62,400) for an entire academic year at the time of enrollment. For purposes of determining a classified employee’s regular annual pay received directly from the community college district, the employing community college district shall exclude any pay received by the classified employee during the previous summer recess period.

(B) For purposes of this section, “summer recess period” means the period that regular class sessions are not being held by a community college district during the months of June, July, and August. Pay earned by a classified employee with limited employment during the months of June, July, or August that is not for the summer session shall not be excluded pursuant to this paragraph.

(e) A community college district that elects to participate in the program shall notify the chancellor’s office in writing, by April 1 during a fiscal
 year in which moneys are appropriated for purposes of this section, on a form developed by the chancellor’s office that it has elected to participate in the program. The community college district shall specify the number of classified employees that have elected to participate in the program and the total estimated amount to be withheld from participating classified employee paychecks for the applicable academic year.

(f) The chancellor’s office shall notify participating community college districts in writing, by May 1 during a fiscal year in which moneys are appropriated for purposes of this section, of the estimated amount of state match funding that a participating classified employee can expect to receive as a result of participating in the program. If the funding provided for purposes of this section is insufficient to provide one dollar ($1) for each one dollar ($1) that has been withheld from participating classified employee monthly
 paychecks, the chancellor’s office shall notify community college districts of the expected prorated amount of state match funds that a participating classified employee can expect to receive as a result of participating in the program.

(g) Participating community college districts shall notify participating classified employees, by June 1 during a fiscal year in which moneys are appropriated for purposes of this section, of the amount of estimated state match funds that a participating classified employee can expect to receive as a result of participating in the program. After receiving that notification, a classified employee may withdraw their election to participate in the program or reduce the amount to be withheld from their paycheck pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) by notifying the employing community college district no later than 30 days after the start of instruction for the applicable fall term of the academic year.

(h) The community college district shall deposit the amounts withheld from participating classified employee monthly paychecks in accordance with the choices made by each participating classified employee pursuant to subdivision (d) in a separate account.

(i) (1) A classified employee that separates from employment with a community college district during the applicable academic year may request from the community college district any pay withheld from their paycheck pursuant to this section.

(2) A classified employee, due to economic or personal hardship, may request from a community college district any pay withheld from their paycheck pursuant to this section.

(3) A classified employee who requests any pay withheld by the community
 college district pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) shall not be entitled to receive any state match funds provided pursuant to this section.

(j) Participating community college districts shall request payment from the chancellor’s office, on or before July 31 following the end of an academic year during which the program was operative, on a form developed by the chancellor’s office, for the amount of classified employee pay withheld from the monthly paychecks of participating classified employees and placed in a separate account pursuant to subdivision (h).

(k) The chancellor’s office may use any unexpended balance of moneys appropriated in any prior fiscal year to the chancellor’s office for purposes of this section to provide up to one dollar ($1) for each one dollar ($1) that has been withheld from participating classified employee monthly paychecks.

(l) The chancellor’s office shall apportion funds to participating community college districts within 30 days of receiving a request for payment by the participating community college district pursuant to subdivision (j). The apportionment shall be determined for each community college district by the chancellor’s office on the basis of the amount that has been withheld from the monthly paychecks of participating classified employees and placed in a separate account pursuant to subdivision (h).

(m) If the total amount requested by participating community college districts exceeds the amount appropriated for purposes of this section, the chancellor’s office shall prorate the amount apportioned to participating community college districts accordingly, based on the amounts requested pursuant to subdivision (j).

(n) The
 participating community college district shall pay participating classified employees the amounts withheld in accordance with the classified employee’s choices, plus the amount apportioned by the chancellor’s office that is attributable to the amount withheld from that classified employee’s paychecks during the applicable academic year. This amount shall be paid to the participating classified employee during the summer recess period, in either one or two payments, in accordance with the classified employee’s option pursuant to subdivision (d).

(o) The state match funding received by participating classified employees pursuant to this section shall not be considered compensation for purposes of determining retirement benefits for the California Public Employees’ Retirement System or the California State Teachers’ Retirement System.

(p) For purposes of this section, the following
 definitions apply:

(1) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(2) “Month” means 20 days or 4 weeks of 5 days each, including legal holidays.

(3) “Program” means the Classified Community College Employee Summer Assistance Program.

(4) “Regular assignment” means a classified employee’s employment job duties during the academic year, excluding the summer recess period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 16.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 52.5. CALIFORNIA COMMUNITY COLLEGES ECONOMIC AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM [88600. - 88651.]



  CHAPTER 1. Mission Statement [88600. - 88600.]

88600.

(a) The economic and workforce development program shall operate according to all of the following principles:

(1) The program shall be responsive to the needs of employers, workers, and students.

(2) The program shall collaborate with other public institutions, aligning resources to foster cooperation across workforce education and service delivery systems, and building well-articulated career pathways.

(3) Program decisions shall be data driven and evidence based, investing resources and adopting practices on the basis of what works.

(4) The program shall develop strong
 partnerships with the private sector, ensuring industry involvement in needs assessment, planning, and program evaluation.

(5) The program shall be outcome oriented and accountable, measuring results for program participants, including students, employers, and workers.

(6) The program shall be accessible to employers, workers, and students who may benefit from its operation.

(7) The program shall provide guidance to local educational agencies on the allocation and oversight of apprenticeship training funds, consistent with the rules set by the California Apprenticeship Council for building and construction trades and for firefighters or by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations for other trades.

(b) The mission of the economic and workforce development program is to do all of the following:

(1) To advance California’s economic growth and global competitiveness through education, training, and services that contribute to continuous workforce improvement.

(2) To advance California’s economic and jobs recovery and sustain economic growth through labor market-aligned education workforce training services, and sector strategies focusing on continuous workforce improvement, technology deployment, and business development, to meet the needs of California’s competitive and emerging industry sectors and industry clusters.

(3) To use labor market information to advise the chancellor’s office and regional community college bodies on the workforce needs of California’s competitive and emerging industry
 sectors and industry clusters, in accordance with both of the following:

(A) To the extent possible, the economic and workforce development program shall work with, share information with, and consider the labor market analyses produced by, the Employment Development Department’s Labor Market Information Division and the California Workforce Development Board.

(B) The economic and workforce development program may also use its own resources to bolster and refine these labor market and industry sector and industry cluster analyses to fulfill its mission.

(4) To provide technical assistance and logistical, technical, and communications infrastructure support that engenders alignment between the career technical education programs of the community college system and the needs of California’s competitive and emerging
 industry sectors and industry clusters.

(5) To collaborate and coordinate investment with other state, regional, or local agencies involved in education and workforce training in California, including, but not necessarily limited to, the California Workforce Development Board, local workforce investment boards, the Employment Training Panel, the State Department of Education, and the Employment Development Department.

(6) To identify, acquire, and leverage community college and other financial and in-kind public and private resources to support economic and workforce development and the career technical education programs of the state’s community colleges.

(7) To work with representatives of business, labor, and professional trade associations to explore and develop alternatives for assisting incumbent workers in the
 state’s competitive and emerging industry sectors. A key objective is to enable incumbent workers to become more competitive in their region’s labor market, increase competency, and identify career pathways to economic self-sufficiency, economic security, and lifelong access to good-paying jobs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 704, Sec. 13.   (AB 235)   Effective September 22, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88651.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [88610. - 88615.]

88610.

(a) The board of governors may award grants and project funds to districts for leadership in accomplishing the mission and goals of the program, provided that funds are appropriated for this purpose in the annual Budget Act. Grants under this section shall be awarded on a competitive basis, as determined by the board of governors and authorized in the annual Budget Act.

(b) (1) The board of governors shall establish an advisory committee for the program and determine the membership pursuant to paragraph (2). The advisory committee shall advise on overall program development, recommend resource deployment, including whether
 projects should be funded at existing levels, increased, decreased, or terminated, and recommend strategies for regional coordination.

(2) The membership of the advisory committee shall include all of the following: representatives from labor, business, and appropriate state agencies; a faculty representative; a classified employee representative; and one community college chief executive officer representative from each of the regions of the program.

(c) At a minimum, the decision criteria for allocating funds to colleges shall be based on each of the following:

(1) An evaluation of the relevance of the grant to the labor market needs of the state and relevant region’s competitive and emerging industry sectors
 and industry clusters, or to the state’s need to fill skills gaps and skills shortages in the economy, including skills gaps and shortages at the state and regional level.

(2) An assessment of the past performance of the grantee if the grantee has been awarded other economic and workforce development grants or other state grants, including an assessment of whether the grantee’s previous awards produced project deliverables specified in prior grant applications.

(3) For grants providing direct services to an employer, a group of employers, or an industry sector or industry cluster, an assessment of the purported beneficial impacts of the grant on the relevant businesses, which may include a review of the grant’s purported impacts on any of the following: increased profitability, increased
 labor productivity, reductions in worker injuries, employer cost savings resulting from improved business processes, improved customer satisfaction, increased employee retention, estimates of new revenue to be generated, sales increases, or new market penetration, as well as information on new products or services developed.

(4) For grants involving direct education and training services provided to workers and students, an assessment of the educational and training goals of the grant, the projected numbers of students and workers served and the projected rates of course and program completion or transfer-readiness, the projected rate of skills attainment for certificates and degrees, and the projected wages and rate of employment placement for those entering the labor market.

(5) For technical assistance and logistical support projects, a concrete enumeration of the ways the project will collaborate with the chancellor’s office to advance sector strategies, regional development, accountability based on performance data, and the adoption of effective workforce and economic development practices.

(d) The chancellor’s office shall provide systemwide oversight and evaluation of the economic and workforce development program, and shall evaluate grant projects and programs to assess whether grantees achieved their stated objectives. The chancellor’s office has the authority to terminate programs for nonperformance.

(e) The chancellor may establish program requirements and performance standards in the administration of the economic and workforce
 development program, and distribute funds as appropriate to implement the program.

(f) The chancellor may provide technical assistance to community colleges for the purpose of improving the competitiveness of their proposals.

(g) Grant funds shall be awarded for the program on a competitive basis.

(h) The chancellor, in awarding short-term competitive funds, shall take into account colleges in economically distressed urban and rural areas, and colleges that have not previously been successful in the competitive bid process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88651.)
-------------------------------------------

88615.

This part shall be implemented only during those fiscal years for which funds are appropriated for purposes of this part in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 88651.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Definitions [88620. - 88620.]

88620.

The following definitions govern the construction of this part:

(a) “Board of governors” means the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(b) “Business Resource Assistance and Innovation Network” means the network of projects and programs that comprise the California Community Colleges Economic and Workforce Development Program.

(c) “California Community Colleges Economic and Workforce Development Program” and “economic and workforce development program” mean the program.

(d) “Career pathways,” and “career ladders,” or “career lattices” mean an identified series of positions,
 work experiences, or educational benchmarks or credentials that offer occupational and financial advancement within a specified career field or related fields over time.

(e) (1) “Center” means a comprehensive program of services offered by one or more community colleges to an economic region of the state in accordance with criteria established by the chancellor’s office for designation as an economic and workforce development program center. Center services shall be designed to respond to the statewide strategic priorities pursuant to the mission of the community colleges’ economic and workforce development program, and to be consistent with programmatic priorities, competitive and emerging industry sectors and industry clusters, identified economic development, career technical education, business development, and continuous workforce training needs of a region. Centers shall provide a foundation for a long-term,
 sustained relationship with businesses, labor, colleges, and other workforce education and training delivery systems, such as local workforce investment boards, in the region.

(2) A center shall support, develop, and deliver direct services to students, businesses, colleges, labor organizations, employees, and employers. For purposes of this subdivision, direct services include, but are not necessarily limited to, data analysis both of labor market information and college performance; intraregion and multiregion sector coordination and logistics; inventory of community college and other assets relevant to meeting a labor market need; curriculum development, curriculum model development, or job task analysis development; articulation of curriculum in a career pathway or career lattice or in a system of stackable credentials; faculty training; calibration to a career readiness or other assessment; assessment administration; career guidance module
 development or counseling; convenings, such as seminars, workshops, conferences, and training; facilitating collaboration between faculty working in related disciplines and sectors; upgrading, leveraging, and developing technology; and other educational services. The establishment and maintenance of the centers is under the sole authority of the chancellor’s office in order to preserve the flexibility of the system to adapt to labor market needs and to integrate resources.

(f) “Chancellor” means the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(g) “Economic security” means, with respect to a worker, earning a wage sufficient to adequately support a family and to, over time, save money for emergency expenses and adequate retirement income, the sufficiency of which is determined considering a variety of factors including household size, the cost of living in the worker’s
 community, and other factors that may vary by region.

(h) “High-priority occupation” means an occupation that has a significant presence in a targeted industry sector or industry cluster, is in demand by employers, and pays or leads to payment of high wages.

(i) “Industry cluster” means a geographic concentration or emerging concentration of interdependent industries with direct service, supplier, and research relationships, or independent industries that share common resources in a given regional economy or labor market. An industry cluster is a group of employers closely linked by a common product or services, workforce needs, similar technologies, and supply chains in a given regional economy or labor market.

(j) “Industry-driven regional collaborative” means a regional public, private, or other community
 organizational structure that jointly defines priorities, delivers services across programs, sectors, and in response to, or driven by, industry needs. The industry-driven regional collaborative projects meet the needs and fill gaps in services that respond to regional business, employee, and labor needs. These service-delivery structures offer flexibility to local communities and partners to meet the identified needs in an economic development region. Industry-driven regional collaboratives are broadly defined to allow maximum local autonomy in developing projects responding to the needs of business, industry, and labor.

(k) “Industry sector” means those firms that produce similar products or provide similar services using somewhat similar business processes.

(l) “Initiative” is an identified strategic priority area that is organized statewide, but is a regionally based effort to
 develop and implement innovative solutions designed to facilitate the development, implementation, and coordination of community college economic development and related programs and services. Each initiative shall be workforce and business development driven by a statewide committee made up of community college faculty and administrators and practitioners and managers from business, labor, and industry. Centers, industry-driven regional collaboratives, and other economic and workforce development programs performing services as a part of the implementation of an initiative shall coordinate services statewide and within regions of the state, as appropriate.

(m) “Job development incentive training” means programs that provide incentives to employers to create entry-level positions in their businesses, or through their suppliers or prime customers, for welfare recipients and the working poor.

(n) “Matching resources” means any combination of public or private resources, either cash or in-kind, derived from sources other than the economic and workforce development program funds appropriated by the annual Budget Act, that are determined to be necessary for the success of the project to which they are applied. The criteria for in-kind resources shall be developed by the board of governors, with advice from the chancellor and the California Community Colleges Economic and Workforce Development Program Advisory Committee, and shall be consistent with generally accepted accounting practices for state and federal matching requirements. The ratio of matching resources to economic and workforce development program funding shall be determined by the board of governors.

(o) “Performance improvement training” means training delivered by a community college that includes all of the following:

(1) An initial needs assessment process that identifies both training and nontraining issues that need to be addressed to improve individual and organizational performance.

(2) Consultation with employers to develop action plans that address business or nonprofit performance improvements.

(3) Training programs that link individual performance requirements with quantifiable business measures, resulting in demonstrable productivity gains, and, as appropriate, job retention, job creation, improvement in wages, or attainment of wages that provide economic security.

(p) “Program” means the California Community Colleges Economic and Workforce Development Program established under this part.
